District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1206.05

Nurse-anesthesia.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 605, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(t), 42 DCR 457

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3306.5.